North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Records.

§ 55A-16-01.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the members or directors without a meeting pursuant to

G.S. 55A-7-04

, 55A-7-08, or 55A-8-21, and a record of all actions taken by committees of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its members, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all members, in alphabetical order by class, showing the number of votes each member is entitled to cast.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles of incorporation or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its members or board of directors relating to the number or classification of directors or to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of members or any class or category of members;

The minutes of all membership meetings, and records of all actions taken by the members without a meeting pursuant to

G.S. 55A-7-04

or

G.S. 55A-7-08

, for the past three years;

All written communications to members generally within the past three years, and the financial statements, if any, that have been furnished or would have been required to be furnished to a member upon demand under

G.S. 55A-16-20

during the past three years;

A list of the names and business or home addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 539, s. 29, effective July 29, 1995.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1969, c. 875, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 31; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, s. 29.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1973 case law on the admissibility of computer printouts, see 52 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1974).

For article, “Toward a Codification of the Law of Evidence in North Carolina,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 669 (1980).

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

§ 55A-16-02.
Inspection of records by members.

A member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and location specified by the corporation, any of the records of the corporation described in G.S. 55A-16-01(e) if the member gives the corporation written notice of his demand at least five business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy.

A member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the member meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation written notice of his demand at least five business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from any records required to be maintained under G.S. 55A-16-01(a), to the extent not subject to inspection under G.S. 55A-16-02(a);

Accounting records of the corporation; and

Subject to

G.S. 55A-16-05

, the membership list.

A member may inspect and copy the records identified in subsection (b) of this section only if:

The member’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The member describes with reasonable particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with this purpose.

This section does not affect:

The right of a member to inspect records under

G.S. 55A-7-20

or, if the member is in litigation with the corporation, to inspect the records to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of this Chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

A member of a corporation that has the power to elect, appoint, or designate a majority of the directors of another domestic or foreign corporation, whether nonprofit or business, shall have inspection rights with respect to the records of that other corporation.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 31; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

In certain respects, the inspection rights provided by this section are more limited than those set forth in former G.S. 55A-27, which provided inspection rights with respect to “all books and records.” However, unlike prior law, inspection rights are now granted with respect to the records of subsidiary corporations. For certain records, subsection (c) imposes conditions other than a “proper purpose,” which was the only requirement under the prior law.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

§ 55A-16-03.
Scope of inspection rights.

A member’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member the agent or attorney represents.

The right to copy records under

G.S. 55A-16-02

includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, electronic, magnetic, or other means.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for producing for inspection or copying any records provided to the member. The charge shall not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a member’s demand to inspect the record of members under G.S. 55A-16-02(b)(3) by providing the member with a list of its members that was compiled no earlier than the date of the member’s demand.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 31; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

§ 55A-16-04.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a member who complies with G.S. 55A-16-02(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the superior court in the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if there is none in this State, its registered office) is located may, upon application of the member, summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a member to inspect and copy any other record, the member who complies with G.S. 55A-16-02(b) and (c) may apply to the superior court in the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if there is none in this State, its registered office) is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the member’s cost (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-16-05.
Limitations on use of membership list.

Without consent of the board of directors, a membership list or any part thereof shall not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose unrelated to a member’s interest as a member. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, and without the consent of the board, a membership list or any part thereof shall not be:

Used to solicit money or property unless such money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by the corporation;

Used for any commercial purpose; or

Sold to or purchased by any person.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 33.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law and was adapted from the Model Act.

§§ 55A-16-06 through 55A-16-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.